Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Mississippi Development Authority Workforce Training Fund

§ 57-1-401.
Mississippi Development Authority Workforce Training Fund created; use of funds.

A special fund, to be designated as the “Mississippi Development Authority Workforce Training Fund,” is created within the State Treasury into which shall be deposited money from any source that is designated for deposit therein. The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund.

All money deposited into the Mississippi Development Authority Workforce Training Fund shall be disbursed by the Mississippi Development Authority to provide workforce training through state institutions of higher learning, community and junior colleges, and Workforce Investment Network job centers to meet workforce training needs not met by other resources. Employers may request training for existing employees and/or newly hired employees from the Mississippi Development Authority. The Mississippi Development Authority shall establish criteria for utilization of the money in the fund and be responsible for approving the training.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Sept. 3, 2010.).